Utah statutes.
76-6-409.9.   Manufacture of an unlawful telecommunication device -- Penalty.

(1)  Any person who intentionally manufactures an unlawful telecommunication device is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  If the offense under this section involves the intentional manufacture of five or more unlawful telecommunication devices within a six-month period, the person committing the offense is guilty of a second degree felony.

